Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-327.07
Damages.

In addition to whatever remedies are available
under the common or statutory laws of this state, the intentional, knowing,
or negligent failure to comply with the requirements of section 28-327 shall
provide a basis for the following damages:

(1) The award
of reasonable costs and attorney's fees; and

(2) A recovery for the
pregnant woman for the wrongful death of her unborn child under section 30-809
upon proving by a preponderance of evidence that the physician knew or should
have known that the pregnant woman's consent was either not fully informed
or not fully voluntary pursuant to section 28-327.

Laws 2010, LB594, § 6.